Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.964

State fire service mobilization—Development of reimbursement procedures.

The Washington state patrol in consultation with the office of financial management and the Washington military department shall develop procedures to facilitate reimbursement to state agencies and jurisdictions from appropriate federal and state funds when state agencies and jurisdictions are mobilized by the chief under the Washington state fire services mobilization plan. The Washington state patrol shall ensure that these procedures provide reimbursement to the host district in as timely a manner as possible.

[ 2003 c 405 s 4; 1997 c 49 s 12; 1995 c 391 s 7; 1992 c 117 s 13. Formerly RCW 38.54.050.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1995 c 391: See note following RCW 38.52.005.

Findings—1992 c 117: See note following RCW 35.21.775.